District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Department of Energy and Environment Rulemaking Clarification
Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 110 of the District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of
2005, effective February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.10), is amended
as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Mayor shall promulgate” and
inserting the phrase “Mayor may promulgate” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is repealed.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of July 29, 2021.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2